Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO LICENSING

CHAPTER 60. DIGITAL LICENSES

Sec. 60.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Licensing authority" means a state agency, county, or municipality that is authorized to issue an occupational license.

(2) "Occupational license" means a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other form of authorization required by statute, ordinance, order, or rule that must be obtained by an individual to engage in a particular business, occupation, or profession.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 719 (H.B. 2453), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 60.002. REQUIREMENTS FOR DIGITAL LICENSES. A licensing authority that issues an occupational license may issue a digital license to a license holder. If the licensing authority issues a digital license, the digital license must comply with the following requirements:

(1) the digital license must be in a secure format and readily accessible by the license holder through an Internet website and on a wireless communication device;

(2) the public must be able to view a license holder's digital license through an Internet website or by using a QR code as defined by Section 443.001, Health and Safety Code; and

(3) if the authority contracts with a vendor for the issuance of a digital license, the digital license must be in a format in which the vendor and authority can verify the validity of the license.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 719 (H.B. 2453), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.